Maryland, session 2026, HB0391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:

HOUSE BILL 391 5
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2026 in the total principal amount of $1,824,782,000.
This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State general obligation
bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and issued, sold, and
delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence this loan or installments of this loan may be sold as a
single issue of bonds under § 8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT – GOVERNOR
D25E03.02 INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION
(A) Nancy K. Kopp Public School Facilities Priority Fund. Provide
grants to schools in accordance with § 5–326 of the Education
Article (Statewide) ....................................................................... 70,000,000
(B) Public School Construction Program. Provide funds to
construct public school buildings and public school capital
improvements, including providing grants to local boards of
education for federal E–rate–eligible special construction such
as fiber and broadband infrastructure projects for
E–rate–eligible applicants in accordance with Title 5, Subtitle
3 of the Education Article (Statewide) ....................................... 300,000,000
(C) Senator James E. “Ed” DeGrange Nonpublic Aging Schools
Program. Provide funds to be distributed as grants to nonpublic
schools in Maryland for expenditures eligible under the Aging
Schools Program, including school security improvements.
Provided that grants may be provided only to nonpublic schools
eligible to receive Aid to Non–Public Schools R00A03.04 (for the
purchase of textbooks or computer hardware and software for
loans to students in eligible nonpublic schools) during the
2025–2026 school year or nonpublic schools that serve students
with disabilities through the Non–Public Placement Program
R00A02.07 Subprogram 0762, excluding preschools in fiscal
2027, with a maximum amount of $100,000 and a minimum

HOUSE BILL 391
amount of $5,000 per eligible school.
Further provided that:
(a) Unless a school serves students through the
Non–Public Placement Program, an eligible school
may apply and qualify for a grant as specified below
based on the following criteria:
(1) At least 20% of the school’s
students are eligible for free
or reduced price meal
programs;
(2) Tuition charged to students
is less than the statewide
average per pupil
expenditure for public
schools as calculated by the
Maryland State Department
of Education; and
(3) The school has a facility with
an average age of 50 years or
more; and
(b) If a school meets:
(1) All three of the criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $100,000;
(2) Two of the three criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $75,000;
and
(3) One of the three criteria
specified above, the school
may receive up to $25,000.
Further provided that if more eligible schools apply and qualify
for grants than the total authorizations, the Maryland State
Department of Education shall prorate the grants based on the
total authorization amount. Further provided that the funds
shall be administered by the Maryland State Department of
Education and the Interagency Commission on School

HOUSE BILL 391 7
Construction. Further provided that grants made to nonpublic
schools shall be expended within 3 years of the date that
funding for the grants became available. Any funding for grants
that is unexpended following 3 years of having become
available shall be transferred to the Unreserved Statewide
Contingency Account for public school construction
(Statewide) ................................................................................... 3,500,000
(D) Supplemental Capital Grant Program for Local School
Systems. Provide funds to local school systems with enrollment
growth that over the last 5 years exceeds 150% of the statewide
average or with 250 or more relocatable classrooms. These
funds shall be administered in accordance with § 5–313 of the
Education Article and can be used for grants to local boards of
education for federal E–rate–eligible special construction such
as fiber and broadband infrastructure projects for
E–rate–eligible applicants (Regional) ........................................ 80,000,000
DA02.01 DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES
(Statewide)
(A) Access Maryland. Provide funds to design and construct
architectural upgrades at State–owned facilities to improve
accessibility for persons with disabilities .................................... 1,124,000
DB01 HISTORIC ST. MARY’S CITY COMMISSION
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Site Improvements. Provide funds to design, construct, and
equip infrastructure improvements in Historic St. Mary’s
City ............................................................................................... 925,000
(B) Visitor Center Conversion for Education and Artisan Centers.
Provide funds to continue design of renovations and expansion
of the visitor center at 18751 Hogaboom Lane and the adjacent
storage facility to create the Education Center and Artisan
Center Complex at Historic St. Mary’s City................................ 420,000
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
GENERAL STATE FACILITIES
(Statewide)
(A) Construction Contingency Fund. Provide funds for the
Construction Contingency Fund to be administered in
accordance with § 3–609 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article. Notwithstanding the fund balance restriction set forth

HOUSE BILL 391
in § 3–609(c) of the State Finance and Procurement Article, an
appropriation to the Fund may cause the total balance in the
Fund to exceed 1.25% of the capital debt affordability limit as
determined under Title 8 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article in fiscal year 2027 ........................................................... 5,000,000
(B) Facilities Renewal Fund. Provide funds for the repair and
rehabilitation of State–owned capital facilities ......................... 59,666,000
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(Anne Arundel County)
(E) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction and equipping of a new Supreme Court of
Maryland Building in Annapolis, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 20,388,000
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(C) Louis L. Goldstein Treasury Building Renovation. Provide
funds to begin design of the Louis L. Goldstein Treasury
Building in Annapolis ................................................................. 2,060,000
(D) Wineland Building Renovation. Provide funds to begin design of
the Fred L. Wineland Building in Annapolis .............................. 281,000
MILITARY DEPARTMENT
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE
(Washington County)
(A) New Hagerstown Vehicle Maintenance Shop. Provide funds to
begin design of a new Vehicle Maintenance Shop in
Hagerstown 500,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.10 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) African American Heritage Preservation Grant Program.
Provide funds to the Maryland Historical Trust to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance

HOUSE BILL 391 9
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article ............. 5,000,000
(B) Historic Preservation Grant Fund. Provide funds to the
Maryland Historical Trust for historic preservation and
museum assistance. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 5A–328 and
5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article ........................................................................................... 1,000,000
FB04 DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland FiRST Public Safety Radio System. Provide funds to
continue construction and installation of equipment for a
statewide unified public safety radio communications system .. 16,268,000
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
J00A01.05 WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT –
CAPITAL
(Regional)
(A) Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Upgrades.
Provide funds to construct improvements and capital
maintenance to bus and rail systems in the Washington, D.C.
area .............................................................................................. 167,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(Statewide)
(A) Community Parks and Playgrounds. Provide funds for grants
to local governments to design, construct, and equip
capital–eligible park and playground improvements ................ 5,000,000
(B) Natural Resources Development Fund. Provide funds to design,
construct, and equip capital development projects on
Department of Natural Resources’ property in accordance with
§ 5–903(g) of the Natural Resources Article. Funds may be
spent only on the projects listed under this program in the
Fiscal Year 2027 Capital Budget Volume or on prior or future
authorized projects ...................................................................... 804,000
(C) Program Open Space. Provide funds to make grants to local

HOUSE BILL 391
jurisdictions for the purchase and development of recreational
facilities. Funds appropriated for local grants shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 5–905 and 5–906 of the
Natural Resources Article ........................................................... 49,775,000
(D) Rural Legacy Program. Provide funds for the purchase of
conservation easements and the acquisition of land. The funds
appropriated for this purpose shall be administered in
accordance with §§ 5–9A–01 through 5–9A–09 of the Natural
Resources Article ......................................................................... 13,400,000
KA14.01 CHESAPEAKE AND COASTAL SERVICE
(Statewide)
(A) Waterway Improvement Capital Projects. Provide funds to
finance projects that expand and improve recreational boating
throughout the State consistent with the State Boat Act. The
funds appropriated for this purpose shall be administered in
accordance with §§ 8–707 through 8–709 of the Natural
Resources Article. Funds may be spent only on the projects
listed under this program in the Fiscal Year 2027 Capital
Budget Volume or on prior or future authorized projects ......... 13,068,000
KA17.01 FISHING AND BOATING SERVICES
(Statewide)
(A) Oyster Restoration Program. Provide funds to design and
construct oyster habitat restoration projects ............................. 2,070,000
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
LA15 OFFICE OF RESOURCE CONSERVATION
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Agricultural Cost–Share Program. Provide funds for
financial assistance for the implementation of best
management practices that reduce soil and nutrient runoff
from Maryland farms. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 8–701 through
8–706 of the Agriculture Article ................................................. 8,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
MA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(A) Community Health Facilities Grant Program. Provide grants
to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip community

HOUSE BILL 391 11
mental health, addiction treatment, and developmental
disabilities facilities. The funds appropriated for this purpose
shall be administered in accordance with §§ 24–601 through
24–607 of the Health – General Article and in accordance with
Code of Maryland Regulations (COMAR) 05.05.09
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 10,000,000
(B) Demolish Decommissioned Buildings. Provide funds to
continue the design of the RICA – Baltimore Old Dormitory
Building demolition (Baltimore City) .......................................... 103,000
(C) Federally Qualified Health Centers Grant Program. Provide
grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and equip
buildings to be used as Federally Qualified Health Centers
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 3,500,000
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to continue construction and begin equipping of
renovations to the North Wing of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital
Center and an addition to the hospital, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 12,363,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.01 MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION –
HAGERSTOWN
(Washington County)
(A) MCI–H Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds
to begin design of the replacement perimeter fencing and
security systems at Maryland Correctional Institution –
Hagerstown .................................................................................. 1,155,000
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
continue construction of the replacement perimeter fencing and
security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary

HOUSE BILL 391
to complete this project .............................................................. 1,511,000
MARYLAND STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
RA11 MARYLAND STATE LIBRARY AGENCY
(Statewide)
(A) Public Library Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire land for, design, construct, and equip public library
facilities, provided that any reallocation of this authorization
or prior authorized funds for previously authorized or new
projects shall require notification to the General Assembly. The
funds appropriated for this purpose shall be administered in
accordance with § 23–509 of the Education Article ................... 12,775,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) Central Electric Substation and Electrical Infrastructure
Upgrades. Provide funds to continue construction of an electric
substation and electrical infrastructure upgrades for the
University of Maryland, Baltimore Campus, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 715,000
(B) New Dental Ambulatory Surgery Center. Provide funds to
complete construction and equipping of an ambulatory surgery
center at the Dental School .......................................................... 862,000
(C) New School of Social Work Building. Provide funds to complete
design, construction, and equipping of a new School of Social
Work ............................................................................................. 43,732,000
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to
continue construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project ................................................................... 29,315,000

HOUSE BILL 391 13
(B) New Interdisciplinary Engineering Building – Zupnik Hall.
Provide funds to complete construction and equipping of the
interdisciplinary engineering building ....................................... 13,110,000
RB23 BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Thurgood Marshall Library and Academic Commons.
Provide funds to continue design of a new Library building and
Academic Commons ..................................................................... 4,802,000
RB24 TOWSON UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Central Plant Restoration. Provide funds for the design,
construction, repair, reconstruction, renovation, and equipping
of the restoration and upgrades to the Central Plant ................ 10,600,000
(B) Electrical Substation Expansion and Improvements. Provide
funds to begin design and construction of a new electrical
substation and renovation of an existing electrical substation .. 2,820,000
(C) Smith Hall Renovation and Reconstruction. Provide funds to
complete construction and equipping of the partial demolition,
renovation, and reconstruction of Smith Hall for the College of
Fine Arts and Communication ..................................................... 21,973,000
RB27 COPPIN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) New Residence Hall. Provide funds to complete construction of
a new residence hall at Coppin State University ....................... 2,000,000
RB29 SALISBURY UNIVERSITY
(Wicomico County)
(A) Blackwell Hall Renovation. Provide funds to complete
construction of the renovation of Blackwell Hall to create a
Student Services Center .............................................................. 1,124,000
RB31 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND BALTIMORE COUNTY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Sherman Hall Renovation. Provide funds to complete
construction of the renovation of Sherman Hall ......................... 9,087,000
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE

HOUSE BILL 391
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
continue construction of deferred maintenance improvements,
including central plant upgrades, at the Rita Colwell Center in
Baltimore City, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this
Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project ..... 2,906,000
RC00 BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Learning Commons Renovation and Addition. Provide funds to
complete design and begin construction and equipping of the
renovation and expansion of the Bard Library to create a
Learning Commons building, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project ........................................................................................... 9,790,000
RD00 ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Campus Infrastructure Improvements. Provide funds to design,
construct, and equip various campus infrastructure
improvement projects .................................................................. 2,271,000
(B) Montgomery Hall Renovation. Provide funds to continue design
of the renovation of Montgomery Hall ........................................ 959,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence, high school
girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite health center,
student center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project ... 1,611,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site

HOUSE BILL 391 15
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project ........................................................................................... 52,360,000
(1) Allegany College of Maryland –
Workforce Development and
Training Center Renovation
(Allegany County)
(2) Anne Arundel Community College –
Dragun Building Renovation (Anne
Arundel County)
(3) Carroll Community College –
Systemic Renovation (Carroll
County)
(4) Chesapeake College – New Queen
Anne’s Technical Building (Queen
Anne’s County)
(5) College of Southern Maryland –
Leonardtown – Building A
Renovation and Expansion (St.
Mary’s County)
(6) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Automotive
Technology Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County)
(7) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County)
(8) Community College of Baltimore
County – Multiple Building Roof
Replacement (Baltimore County)
(9) Frederick Community College –
Catoctin Hall Renovation and
Addition (Frederick County)

HOUSE BILL 391
(10) Hagerstown Community College –
Advanced Technology Center
Renovation (Washington County)
(11) Hagerstown Community College –
Second Entrance Widening
(Washington County)
(12) Howard Community College – New
Workforce Development and
Trades Center (Howard County)
(13) Montgomery College – Rockville
Library Renovation (Montgomery
County)
(14) Wor–Wic Community College –
Maintenance Building Expansion
(Wicomico County)
(B) Community College Facilities Renewal Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the community colleges with improvements,
repairs, and deferred maintenance projects. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with §16–320 of the Education
Article (Statewide) ....................................................................... 2,618,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to complete design and continue construction of a new electrical
substation, substation upgrades, and related electrical
infrastructure components at Morgan State University,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
continue on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project ............................................. 40,486,000
(B) Carter–Grant–Wilson Building Renovation. Provide funds to
continue design of the renovation of the Carter–Grant–Wilson
building for the School of Graduate Studies and the Division of
International Affairs .................................................................... 100,000
(C) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to continue
construction and begin equipping of the New Science Center,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
continue on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete this project .............................................. 106,991,000

HOUSE BILL 391 17
RQ00 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM
(A) Comprehensive Cancer Center. Provide a grant to the
University of Maryland Medical System to design, construct,
and equip facilities to expand clinical programs of the Marlene
and Stewart Greenebaum Comprehensive Cancer Center
(Baltimore City) ........................................................................... 5,000,000
(B) R Adams Cowley Shock Trauma Center – Phase III. Provide a
grant to the University of Maryland Medical System to assist in
the design, construction, and equipping of Phase III of
renovations, upgrades, and expansion to the R Adams Cowley
Shock Trauma Center (Baltimore City) ...................................... 5,000,000
(C) University of Maryland Shore Regional Health – New Easton
Regional Medical Center. Provide a grant to the University of
Maryland Medical System to assist in the design, construction,
and equipping of a new campus and facilities for the University
of Maryland Shore Regional Health – Regional Medical Center
in Easton (Talbot County) ............................................................ 20,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
SA24 DIVISION OF NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION
(A) Baltimore Regional Neighborhood Initiative. Provide funds for
grants and loans to nonprofit community development
corporations or coalitions to fund comprehensive revitalization
strategies for Sustainable Communities in Baltimore City,
Baltimore County, and Anne Arundel County (Regional) .......... 20,000,000
(B) Business Facade Improvement Program. Provide funds for
grants to subdivisions and community development
organizations to assist businesses located in Sustainable
Communities with improving the outside appearance of their
facilities (Statewide) ..................................................................... 5,000,000
(C) Community Legacy Program. Provide funds to assist
neighborhoods with revitalization efforts. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 6–201 through 6–211 of the
Housing and Community Development Article and Code of
Maryland Regulations (COMAR) 05.17.01. Provided that any
financial assistance awarded under this program is not subject
to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 8,000,000

HOUSE BILL 391
(D) National Capital Strategic Economic Development Fund.
Provide funds for grants and loans to government agencies and
nonprofit community development organizations in support of
commercial and residential development activities in areas of
the National Capital Region as set forth by § 6–710 of the
Housing and Community Development Article (Regional) ........ 20,000,000
(E) Seed Community Development Anchor Institution Fund.
Provide funds for grants to higher education and health care
institutions for community enhancement projects in
Sustainable Communities and blighted areas. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with § 4–509 of the Housing and
Community Development Article (Statewide) ............................ 10,000,000
(F) Strategic Demolition Fund. Provide funds for grants and loans
to government agencies and community development
organizations for demolition, land assembly, architecture and
engineering, and site development in designated Sustainable
Communities. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with § 4–508 of the Housing and Community Development
Article. Provided that any financial assistance awarded under
this program is not subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article (Statewide) ................................................. 60,000,000
SA25 DIVISION OF DEVELOPMENT FINANCE
(Statewide)
(A) Appraisal Gap Program – UPLIFT. Provide gap financing to
developers and homeowners for the difference between the
value of mortgages for distressed properties and their value
after renovation. These funds shall be administered in
accordance with §§ 4–2801 through 4–2806 of the Housing and
Community Development Article ................................................ 10,000,000
(B) Homeownership Programs. Provide funds for below–market
interest rate mortgages with minimum down payments to
low– and moderate–income homebuyers. These funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 4–235 through 4–241,
4–501, 4–502, 4–801 through 4–810, and 4–814 through 4–816
of the Housing and Community Development Article. Provided
that any financial assistance awarded under this program is
not subject to § 8–301 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article............................................................................................ 20,000,000
(C) Partnership Rental Housing Program. Provide funds to be
credited to the Partnership Rental Housing Fund to be

HOUSE BILL 391 19
administered in accordance with §§ 4–501, 4–503, and 4–1201
through 4–1209 of the Housing and Community Development
Article............................................................................................ 8,000,000
(D) Rental Housing Programs. Provide funds for rental housing
developments that serve low– and moderate–income
households. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with §§ 4–401 through 4–411, 4–501, and 4–504 of the Housing
and Community Development Article ......................................... 65,000,000
(E) Shelter and Transitional Housing Facilities Grant Program.
Provide grants to acquire, design, construct, renovate, and
equip emergency shelters, transitional housing, and other
facilities for homeless individuals and families. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with Code of Maryland
Regulations (COMAR) 05.05.09 ................................................... 3,000,000
SA30 DIVISION OF BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
(Statewide)
(A) Neighborhood Business Development Program. Provide funds
for grants and loans to fund community–based economic
development activities in revitalization areas designated by
local governments. The funds shall be administered in
accordance with §§ 6–301 through 6–311 of the Housing and
Community Development Article .............................................. 10,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
TG00 DIVISION OF MARKETING, TOURISM, AND THE ARTS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Arts Capital Grant Program. Provide funds to
eligible organizations for the acquisition, expansion,
renovation, or major repair of facilities or other infrastructure.
This program shall be administered in accordance with § 4–514
of the Economic Development Article ......................................... 3,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT
UA01 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(Statewide)
(A) Bay Restoration Fund Wastewater Program. Provide funds to
local governments to upgrade major and minor wastewater
treatment plants, connect septic systems to public sewer, abate
combined sewer overflow, rehabilitate existing sewers, upgrade

HOUSE BILL 391
conveyance systems, and upgrade stormwater management in
Maryland. The funds shall be administered in accordance with
§ 9–1605.2 of the Environment Article ....................................... 50,000,000
(B) Comprehensive Flood Management Grant Program. Provide
funds to local governments for projects that reduce the risk of
loss of life and property from flooding. Grant funds may be used
to acquire flood–prone properties for demolition or relocation,
install flood warning systems, and construct flood control
projects, including engineering studies required to support the
design of these projects. Capital projects that assist with flood
management techniques may include but are not limited to:
flood control dams, levees and dikes, stormwater detention or
retention structures, and flood proofing ..................................... 4,382,000
(C) Maryland Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund. Provide funds
to finance drinking water projects. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with § 9–1605.1 of the
Environment Article .................................................................... 14,896,000
(D) Maryland Water Quality Revolving Loan Fund. Provide funds
to finance water quality improvement projects. The funds shall
be administered in accordance with § 9–1605 of the
Environment Article .................................................................... 19,591,000
(E) Supplemental Assistance Program. Provide grants to assist
grant and loan recipients to meet the local share of construction
costs for wastewater facility improvements. The funds shall be
administered in accordance with §§ 9–345 through 9–350 of the
Environment Article .................................................................... 3,000,000
(F) Water Supply Financial Assistance Program. Provide funds for
assistance to State and local government entities to acquire,
design, construct, rehabilitate, equip, and improve water
supply facilities. The funds shall be administered in accordance
with §§ 9–420 through 9–426 of the Environment Article and
any regulation adopted in accordance with those sections ........ 2,419,000
UB00 MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE
(Statewide)
(A) State Water and Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Fund.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip water and
wastewater facility improvements for State institutions,
provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may
commence on a project prior to the appropriation of all funds
necessary to complete the project. Expenditures for a project

HOUSE BILL 391 21
detailed in the Fiscal Year 2027 Capital Budget Volume under
this program may not exceed the amount listed therein by more
than 7.5% without notification to the General Assembly. Funds
may be spent only on the projects listed under this program in
the Fiscal Year 2027 Capital Budget Volume or on prior or
future authorized projects. Expenditure of any part of this
appropriation for a prior or future authorized project shall also
require notification to the General Assembly ............................ 11,115,000
VE01 DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Cheltenham Youth Treatment Center. Provide funds to
begin design of a new residential treatment center for male and
female youths at the Department of Juvenile Services’
Cheltenham campus .................................................................... 4,292,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(A) Barrack A – Waterloo: New Barrack and Garage and Historic
Barrack Renovation. Provide funds to continue design of a new
barrack and garage, and the renovation of a historic barrack in
Waterloo (Howard County) ......................................................... 763,000
(B) Barrack J – Annapolis: Communications Room and New
Garage. Provide funds to complete construction of a new garage
and the renovation of Barrack J in Annapolis for a new
communications room (Anne Arundel County) .......................... 3,579,000
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(A) Allegany County Historical Society – New History Discovery
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Allegany County Historical Society Museum for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the historic 1845
Canada Hose House and Blue Springs parcel (Allegany
County) ........................................................................................ 355,000
(B) American Legion Post 47 Renovation. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of The Joseph L. Davis Post No. 47 The
American Legion Incorporated for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the American Legion
Post 47 (Harford County) ............................................................ 150,000
(C) Ascension Saint Agnes – Family Birthing Center. Provide a

HOUSE BILL 391
grant to the Board of Directors of Saint Agnes HealthCare for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Family Birthing Center (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 500,000
(D) Ashley Addiction Treatment – Infrastructure Improvements.
Provide a grant to the Ashley, Inc. for the planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements on the main campus in Havre de Grace,
Maryland (Harford County) ........................................................ 250,000
(E) Baltimore Museum of Art – Infrastructure Improvements.
Provide a grant to the governing board of The Baltimore
Museum of Art, Inc. for the planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Baltimore Museum of Art, including
repairs to the building’s staircases, primary elevator, building
HVAC system, and related improvements (Baltimore City) ..... 750,000
(F) Baltimore Museum of Industry – New Key Bridge Exhibit.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the Baltimore
Museum of Industry for the planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Key Bridge Exhibition (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 250,000
(G) Baltimore Symphony Orchestra. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra Endowment
Trust for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Joseph Meyerhoff
Symphony Hall (Baltimore City) ................................................ 1,000,000
(H) Banneker–Douglass–Tubman Museum Renovation. Provide a
grant to the Maryland Commission on African American
History and Culture for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Banneker–Douglass–Tubman Museum (Anne Arundel
County) ........................................................................................ 1,000,000
(I) Bowie Mill Bike Trail. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Montgomery County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the

HOUSE BILL 391 23
Bowie Mill bike trail (Montgomery County) .............................. 1,750,000
(J) Catholic Charities – Intergenerational Center. Provide a grant
to the Board of Directors of the Associated Catholic Charities
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Catholic Charities Intergenerational
Center (Baltimore City) ............................................................... 1,000,000
(K) Central Baltimore Partnership – North Avenue Market
Redevelopment. Provide a grant to the Central Baltimore
Partnership for the planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the redevelopment and historic preservation of the
North Avenue Market (Baltimore City) ...................................... 500,000
(L) Charles E. Smith Life Communities – Ring House Renovation.
Provide a grant to the Charles E. Smith Life Communities
Trustee Funds Inc. for the planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the renovation of the Ring House in
Montgomery County (Montgomery County) ............................... 800,000
(M) City of Annapolis – Housing Authority Properties
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council
of the City of Annapolis for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of capital
improvements to properties owned by the Housing Authority of
the City of Annapolis (Anne Arundel County) ........................... 500,000
(N) City of Cambridge – Multiple Bridge Improvements. Provide a
grant to the City of Cambridge for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of five
bridges in Cambridge (Dorchester County) ................................. 3,000,000
(O) City of Frostburg – Water Sustainability Improvements.
Provide a grant to the Mayor and City Council of Frostburg for
the planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
water well, tank, and pump station projects (Allegany
County) ........................................................................................ 400,000
(P) Crownsville Hospital Memorial Park – Meyer Building
Renovation. Provide a grant to the County Executive and
County Council of Anne Arundel County for the acquisition,

HOUSE BILL 391
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Meyer Building (Anne Arundel County) .................................... 4,000,000
(Q) Diakonia, Inc. – New Supportive Housing. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of Diakonia, Inc. for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the supportive living
campus project, including an expanded Veterans Service
Center, on Maryland’s Lower Eastern Shore (Worcester
County) ......................................................................................... 700,000
(R) Downtown Frederick Hotel and Conference Center. Provide a
grant to the City of Frederick for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
New Downtown Frederick Hotel and Conference Center
(Frederick County) ....................................................................... 5,500,000
(S) Fello, Inc. – New Easton Crossing Development. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Fello, Inc., for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Easton Crossing mixed–use development project (Talbot
County) ......................................................................................... 2,000,000
(T) Friends of Patapsco Valley State Park – Whiting Property
Capital Improvements. Provide a grant to the Friends of
Patapsco Valley State Park for the planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Patapsco Valley
Gateway public access project (Howard County) ........................ 1,000,000
(U) Garrett College – Intercollegiate Athletics Facilities
Expansion. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of Garrett
College for the planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the intercollegiate athletics facilities expansion
(Garrett County) ........................................................................... 307,000
(V) Glen Echo Park Spanish Ballroom Renovation. Provide a grant
to the County Executive and County Council of Montgomery
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the historic Glen Echo
Park Spanish Ballroom (Montgomery County) .......................... 1,000,000

HOUSE BILL 391 25
(W) Hagerstown Regional Airport – New Control Tower. Provide a
grant to the City of Hagerstown for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
air traffic control tower (Washington County) ............................ 1,500,000
(X) Historic Annapolis Restoration. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Historic Annapolis, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Brice House and other State–owned historic properties leased
to Historic Annapolis, Inc. (Anne Arundel County) .................... 3,000,000
(Y) It Takes a Village to Help Our Children – New Village Youth
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of It Takes a
Village to Help Our Children, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
Village Youth Center (Somerset County) .................................... 495,000
(Z) Johns Hopkins University – Data Science and Computing
Infrastructure. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of
Johns Hopkins University for the planning, design,
construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of a computer facility to
support the new Data Science Institute (Baltimore City) .......... 5,000,000
(AA) Jug Handle Connector. Provide a grant to the County Executive
and County Council of Howard County for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Route 29 North–South Jug Handle Connector (Howard
County) ......................................................................................... 3,000,000
(AB) Kennedy Krieger – Innovative Care Center. Provide a grant to
the Board of Directors of the Kennedy Krieger Institute, Inc.
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new Innovative Care Center (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 3,000,000
(AC) Kingdom Care Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of the Kingdom Global Community Development Corporation
(KGCDC) for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the Kingdom Care
Center (Prince George’s County) ................................................ 1,000,000

HOUSE BILL 391
(AD) Krimson Achievement Foundation. Provide a grant to the
Krimson Achievement Foundation for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
new Krimson Achievement Foundation Center (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 250,000
(AE) LifeBridge Health – Sinai Hospital Surgery Center Renovation.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Sinai Hospital of
Baltimore, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the surgery center
at Sinai Hospital (Baltimore City) .............................................. 2,000,000
(AF) Luminis Health Doctors Community Medical Center – New
Obstetrical Care Tower. Provide a grant to the Luminis Health
Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc. for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements to the Luminis Health Doctors
Community Medical Center, including a new obstetrical care
tower (Prince George’s County) ................................................... 10,000,000
(AG) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Johns Hopkins University. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of Johns Hopkins University for the design,
construction, and equipping of the renovation of the Peabody
Institute, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide
an equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 1,600,000
(AH) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
St. John’s College. Provide a grant to the Board of Visitors and
Governors of St. John’s College for the design, construction, and
equipping of a new Arts and Academic Hall, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Anne Arundel County) ...................... 3,200,000
(AI) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Washington College. Provide a grant to the Board of Visitors
and Governors of Washington College for the design,
construction, and equipping of the new Warehime School of

HOUSE BILL 391 27
Global Business, Economics, and Social Impact, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Kent County) ...................................... 3,200,000
(AJ) Maryland Zoo in Baltimore – Infrastructure and Habitat
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of the
Maryland Zoological Society, Inc. to assist in funding the
design, construction, and equipping of building, infrastructure,
and habitat improvements for the exhibits and operations of
the Maryland Zoo in Baltimore (Baltimore City) ....................... 4,750,000
(AK) MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital
Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to MedStar Southern Maryland Hospital,
including construction of an Advanced Critical Care Tower
(Prince George’s County) .............................................................. 8,000,000
(AL) Meritus Health – Brook Lane Infrastructure Improvements.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Meritus Health,
Inc., for the planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements at Brook Lane Health Services
facility (Washington County) ....................................................... 500,000
(AM) Mount Vernon Place Conservancy – North and South Squares
Revitalization. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
Mount Vernon Place Conservancy, Inc. for the planning,
design, construction, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of the revitalization of the
North and South Squares at Mount Vernon Place (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 500,000
(AN) Mt. Royal Elementary/Middle School – New Outdoor Play Area.
Provide a grant to Friends of Mt. Royal School for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the Mt. Royal Elementary/Middle School Outdoor
Play Area (Baltimore City) .......................................................... 500,000
(AO) National Aquarium in Baltimore – Infrastructure
Improvements. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the
National Aquarium in Baltimore, Inc. to assist in the design,

HOUSE BILL 391
construction, renovation, and equipping of infrastructure
improvements at the National Aquarium in Baltimore
(Baltimore City) ............................................................................ 4,000,000
(AP) New Calcined Clay Facility. Provide a grant to the County
Executive and County Council of Cecil County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a calcined clay facility (Cecil County) .................... 7,500,000
(AQ) New Harriet Elizabeth Brown Statue. Provide a grant to the
Board of County Commissioners of Calvert County for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of a commemorative Harriet Elizabeth Brown Statue
(Calvert County) ........................................................................... 250,000
(AR) New Somerset County Emergency Medical Services Facility.
Provide a grant to the Board of County Commissioners of
Somerset County for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a new emergency
medical services facility (Somerset County) ................................ 500,000
(AS) North East Housing Initiative – New Community Land Trust
Homes. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the North
East Housing Initiative for the planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of 10 Community Land Trust homes
(Statewide) .................................................................................... 500,000
(AT) Olney Satellite Police Station and Community Facility. Provide
a grant to the Olney Chamber of Commerce, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Olney Satellite Police Station and community facility
(Montgomery County) .................................................................. 1,000,000
(AU) Parks and People – ReInvest Baltimore Green Space
Infrastructure Improvements. Provide a grant to the Parks and
People Foundation for the planning, design, construction,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the transformation of vacant properties
into green spaces in Baltimore City (Baltimore City) ................ 100,000
(AV) Pascal Crisis Services – HVAC System Replacement. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Pascal Crisis Services, Inc.

HOUSE BILL 391 29
for the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of a new HVAC system (Anne Arundel
County) ......................................................................................... 100,000
(AW) Pikesville Armory Foundation – Pikesville Armory Renovation.
Provide a grant to the governing board of the Pikesville Armory
Foundation, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of the Pikesville
Armory (Baltimore County) ......................................................... 1,500,000
(AX) Revolutionary VP – New Production Studio. Provide a grant to
Revolutionary VP, Inc. for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a virtual production
studio (Prince George’s County) .................................................. 3,000,000
(AY) Ripken Stadium Renovation and Expansion. Provide a grant to
Unrivaled Sports for the acquisition, planning, design,
construction, expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction,
site improvement, and capital equipping of a redevelopment
and expansion of facilities at Ripken Stadium in Aberdeen
(Harford County) .......................................................................... 5,000,000
(AZ) Roca Baltimore – Infrastructure Improvements. Provide a
grant to the Board of Directors of Roca Baltimore, Inc. for the
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
infrastructure improvements, including repairs to the garage
floor of Roca Baltimore’s facility (Baltimore City) ...................... 100,000
(BA) Security Square Mall Renovation and Replacement. Provide a
grant to the County Executive and County Council of Baltimore
County for the acquisition, planning, design, construction,
expansion, repair, renovation, reconstruction, site
improvement, and capital equipping of infrastructure
improvements to Security Square Mall (Baltimore County) ...... 2,500,000
(BB) St. Michaels Community Center, Inc. – New Community
Center. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of the St.
Michaels Community Center, Inc. for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of a
new St. Michaels Community Center facility (Talbot County) .. 800,000
(BC) Suburban Hospital – Emergency Department Expansion.

HOUSE BILL 391
Provide a grant to the Board of Trustees of The Johns Hopkins
Health System for the planning, design, construction, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the expansion of the Suburban Hospital
Emergency Department (Montgomery County) .......................... 1,000,000
(BD) The Benedictine School for Exceptional Children – New
Residential Facilities. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors
of The Benedictine School for Exceptional Children, Inc. for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the school residential facilities (Caroline
County) ......................................................................................... 1,000,000
(BE) The Johns Hopkins Hospital – Pediatric Emergency Dept.
Psychiatric Unit Expansion. Provide a grant to the Board of
Trustees of The Johns Hopkins Hospital to assist in the design,
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of the
Pediatric Emergency Department Psychiatric Unit (Baltimore
City) .............................................................................................. 300,000
(BF) Thirty Five Ventures – Silver Hill Redevelopment. Provide a
grant to the Thirty Five Ventures, LLC for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of
mixed–use community space in Suitland (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 8,500,000
(BG) University of Maryland Enterprise Corporation – Capital of
Quantum Initiative. Provide a grant to the University of
Maryland Enterprise Corporation for the acquisition, planning,
design, construction, expansion, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Capital of Quantum Initiative (Prince George’s County) ........... 10,000,000
(BH) Westminster Fiber Project. Provide a grant to the Mayor and
City Council of the City of Westminster for the acquisition,
planning, design, construction, repair, renovation,
reconstruction, site improvement, and capital equipping of the
Westminster fiber project (Carroll County) ................................ 1,000,000
(BI) Westport Capital Development – Kloman Street Relocation.
Provide a grant to Westport Capital Development, LLC for the
acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion, repair,
renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and capital
equipping of the relocation and realignment of Kloman Street
in Baltimore City (Baltimore City) .............................................. 1,000,000

HOUSE BILL 391 31
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION
(A) Atlantic General Hospital Corporation. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Atlantic General Hospital Corporation to
assist in the construction, expansion, renovation, and
equipping of Intensive Care Unit patient rooms and the central
nursing station, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Worcester County) ................................................................ 130,000
(B) CalvertHealth Primary Care. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of CalvertHealth Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of primary
care facilities in North Beach and Prince Frederick, subject to
the requirement that the grantee provide an equal and
matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended
prior to the effective date of this Act (Calvert County) .............. 2,422,000
(C) Civista Medical Center, Inc. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Civista Medical Center, Inc. dba University of
Maryland Charles Regional Medical Center to assist in the
construction, expansion, renovation, and equipping of a new
Interventional Radiology Laboratory and storage space for
Surgical Services, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Charles County) .................................................................... 525,000
(D) Frederick Health Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Frederick Health Hospital, Inc. to assist in the
design, construction, renovation, and equipping of the Birth
Place, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Frederick
County) ........................................................................................ 1,680,000
(E) Kennedy Krieger Children’s Hospital. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Kennedy Krieger Children’s Hospital, Inc.
dba Kennedy Krieger Institute to assist in the construction,
renovation, and equipping of a new Outpatient Healthcare
Hub, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an

HOUSE BILL 391
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Prince George’s
County) ......................................................................................... 1,400,000
(F) Luminis Health Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc.
Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of Luminis Health
Doctors Community Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the
construction and renovation of the Cardiac Catheterization
Lab, Interventional Radiology suite, and associated clinical
support spaces, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Prince George’s County) ....................................................... 626,000
(G) MedStar Harbor Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Harbor Hospital, Inc. dba MedStar Harbor
Hospital to assist in the construction, renovation, and
equipping of the Emergency Department, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) ................................... 1,680,000
(H) Mercy Medical Center. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Mercy Medical Center, Inc. to assist in the
construction, renovation, and equipping of the Emergency
Department, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore City) ..................................................................... 1,680,000
(I) Montgomery General Hospital, Inc. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of MedStar Montgomery Medical Center to
assist in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
the Emergency Department, subject to the requirement that
the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Montgomery County) ......................... 420,000
(J) Saint Agnes Healthcare, Inc. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of Saint Agnes Healthcare, Inc. to assist in the
construction, renovation, and equipping of the Ascension Saint
Agnes Emergency Department, subject to the requirement that

HOUSE BILL 391 33
the grantee provide an equal and matching fund for this
purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the
matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) ................................... 420,000
(K) Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. Provide a grant to the
Board of Directors of Sheppard Pratt Health System, Inc. to
assist in the construction, renovation, and equipping of the
Towson Campus, subject to the requirement that the grantee
provide an equal and matching fund for this purpose.
Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund
may consist of funds expended prior to the effective date of this
Act (Baltimore County) ............................................................... 665,000
(L) The Johns Hopkins Hospital. Provide a grant to the Board of
Directors of the Johns Hopkins Hospital to assist in the design,
construction, renovation, and equipping of a pediatric sedation
unit in the Johns Hopkins Children’s Center, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act (Baltimore City) ................................... 150,000
(M) TidalHealth Peninsula Regional. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of TidalHealth Peninsula Regional, Inc. to assist in
the construction, renovation, and equipping of its inpatient
units, subject to the requirement that the grantee provide an
equal and matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding
Section 1(5) of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds
expended prior to the effective date of this Act (Wicomico
County) ......................................................................................... 1,680,000
(N) University of Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center,
Inc. Provide a grant to the Board of Directors of University of
Maryland Baltimore Washington Medical Center, Inc. to assist
in the construction, expansion, relocation, renovation, and
equipping of the senior and primary care facilities, subject to
the requirement that the grantee provide an equal and
matching fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended
prior to the effective date of this Act (Anne Arundel County) ... 522,000
ZA02 LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(A) Legislative Initiatives. Provide funds for projects of political
subdivisions and nonprofit organizations .................................. 37,500,000

HOUSE BILL 391
ZA03 LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVES
(Statewide)
(A) Legislative Initiatives. Provide funds for projects of political
subdivisions and nonprofit organizations .................................. 37,500,000
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
of the bonds.
(5) (a) Prior to the payment of any matching grant funds under the provisions
of Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, grantees shall provide and expend
matching funds as specified. No part of a grantee’s matching fund may be provided, either
directly or indirectly, from funds of the State, whether appropriated or unappropriated.
Except as otherwise provided, no part of the fund may consist of real property, in kind
contributions, or funds expended prior to the effective date of this Act. In case of any dispute
as to what money or assets may qualify as matching funds, the Board of Public Works shall
determine the matter, and the Board’s decision is final. Grantees have until June 1, 2028,
to present evidence satisfactory to the Board of Public Works that the matching fund will
be provided. If satisfactory evidence is presented, the Board shall certify this fact to the
State Treasurer and the proceeds of the loan shall be expended for the purposes provided in
this Act. If this evidence is not presented by June 1, 2028, the proceeds of the loan shall be
applied to the purposes authorized in § 8–129 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(b) It is further provided that when an equal and matching fund is specified
in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, grantees shall provide a matching fund
equal to the lesser of (i) the authorized amount of the State grant or (ii) the amount of the
matching fund certified by the Board of Public Works. If satisfactory evidence is presented,
the Board shall certify this fact and the amount of the matching fund to the State Treasurer
and the proceeds of the loan equal to the amount of the matching fund shall be expended for
the purposes provided in this Act. If this evidence is not presented by June 1, 2028, the
proceeds of the loan shall be applied to the purposes authorized in § 8–129 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article. The proceeds of any amount of the loan in excess of the
matching fund certified by the Board of Public Works shall also be applied to the purposes
authorized in § 8–129 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(6) (a) Prior to approval by the Board of Public Works of an expenditure of bond
proceeds authorized under Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act, the grantee
shall grant and convey to the Maryland Historical Trust a historic preservation easement
on the property where the capital project assisted by the bond proceeds is located if the
Director of the Trust determines that the capital project impacts real property that is
individually listed in, or eligible for individual listing in, the Maryland Register of Historic
Properties, unless the Director of the Trust also determines that the real property:
(i) Is a type that is already adequately represented among the

HOUSE BILL 391 35
Trust’s existing easement properties;
(ii) Is already subject to adequate protections of historic preservation
law or instrument; or
(iii) Has conditions peculiar to it that make requiring an easement
impractical.
(b) If the grantee holds a lease on the property, the Trust may accept an
easement on the leasehold interest.
(c) The easement must be in form, substance, and duration acceptable to
the Director of the Trust.
(d) (i) A recipient may administratively appeal to the Maryland
Historical Trust Board of Trustees a determination made by the Director of the Trust under
subparagraph (a) of this paragraph.
(ii) The decision made by the Maryland Historical Trust Board of
Trustees on an appeal is final and is not subject to further administrative appeal or judicial
review.
(7) The proceeds of the loan must be expended or encumbered by the Board of
Public Works for the purposes provided in this Act no later than June 1, 2033. If any funds
authorized by this Act remain unexpended or unencumbered after June 1, 2033, the amount
of the unexpended or unencumbered authorization shall be canceled and be of no further
force and effect.
(8) Multiple grants provided to the same organization in this Section are in
addition to one another. Unless otherwise provided, any matching fund requirements apply
to each individual grant.
(9) (a) Subject to subparagraph (b) of this paragraph, the Board of Public
Works may approve an appropriation in Section 1(3) Items ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act
or in any other previously enacted Maryland Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Act,
notwithstanding differences in:
(i) The name of the grantee or the description of the project, provided
that the proposed use of funds is consistent with the public purpose of the original
appropriation; or
(ii) The location of the project.
(b) When the difference in the name of the grantee is nonsubstantive and
the identity of the grantee can be determined, and when the difference in the description of
the project is nonsubstantive and is consistent with the public purpose of the original
appropriation, the Department of General Services shall record the correct grantee

HOUSE BILL 391
identification and project description in the grant agreement entered into by the grantee
with the State of Maryland and recorded with the Board of Public Works. In all other
instances of differences provided in subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, the Department of
Budget and Management shall notify the Office of Policy Analysis within the Department
of Legislative Services in writing of:
(i) The differences between an appropriation in Section 1(3) Items
ZA00 through ZB02 of this Act and the proposed use of the funds; and
(ii) The justification that the proposed use of the funds is consistent
with the public purpose of the appropriation.
(c) (i) The Office of Policy Analysis shall have 45 days to review and
comment on the proposed use of the funds.
(ii) If the Office of Policy Analysis does not submit written objections
within 45 days, the Department of Budget and Management shall provide certification in
writing to the Board of Public Works that the proposed use of funds may be approved
notwithstanding technical differences in the appropriation in Section 1(3) Items ZA00
through ZB02 of this Act.
(d) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the provisions of this
paragraph:
(i) Provide an administrative process authorizing the approval of
grants by the Board of Public Works, provided that the proposed use of funds is consistent
with the public purpose of the original appropriation; and
(ii) Be applicable to this Act and all prior Maryland Consolidated
Capital Bond Loans.
(10) Notwithstanding § 8–122.1 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, the
principal amount of any loan authorized under this Act shall be reduced by the cash
proceeds, excluding any accrued interest, received for the State bonds and allocated by the
Comptroller to the loan.
(11) Notwithstanding §§ 8–125(e) and 8–132 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, the State Treasurer shall determine the amount of premium from the sale of bonds
in fiscal year 2026 to be transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund. Upon each issuance of State
bonds in fiscal year 2026, the Treasurer shall notify the Comptroller of the Treasurer’s
determination and the Comptroller shall credit the premium accordingly. Premium from
the sale of bonds in fiscal year 2026 that is not transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund may,
upon approval of the Board of Public Works, be expended by the Comptroller for any of the
public purposes set forth in Section 1(3) of this Act, including any applicable architects’ and
engineers’ fees.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read

HOUSE BILL 391 37
as follows:
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
VE01 RESIDENTIAL SERVICES
(B) New Female Detention Center. Provide funds to continue
design and begin acquiring easements for utility connections for
a replacement detention facility for female youths on the
grounds of the Thomas O’Farrell Youth Center (Carroll
County) ......................................................................................... [2,525,000]
2,182,168
Chapter 495 of the Acts of 2015, as amended by Chapter
27 of the Acts of 2016, Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017,
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018, Chapter 14 of the Acts of
2019, Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, Chapter 344 of the
Acts of 2022, Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, and
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2015 in the total principal amount of [$1,058,380,749]
$1,058,037,917. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016
Section 1(3)
DA07.01 DEPARTMENT OF AGING
(Statewide)
(A) Senior Centers Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire property and to design, construct, renovate, and equip
senior citizen activities centers. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§ 10–501
through 10–510 of the Human Services Article.

HOUSE BILL 391
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 ............................................................................................. 1,680,000
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter 9
of the Acts of 2018 and Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
VE01 RESIDENTIAL SERVICES
(A) New Female Detention Center. Provide funds to continue
design, continue acquiring easements for utility connections,
and begin construction for a replacement detention facility for
female youths on the grounds of the Thomas O’Farrell Youth
Center, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may continue on this project prior to the appropriation
of all funds necessary to complete this project (Carroll
County) ..................................................................................... [1,168,000]
176,400
Chapter 27 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter
22 of the Acts of 2017, Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018,
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, Chapter 537 of the Acts of
2020, Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, Chapter 344 of the
Acts of 2022, and Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2016 in the total principal amount of [$964,522,415]
$963,530,815. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 537 of the Acts
of 2020 and Chapter 141 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
ZA01 MARYLAND HOSPITAL ASSOCIATION

HOUSE BILL 391 39
(I) Union Hospital of Cecil County. Provide a grant to the Board
of Directors of Union Hospital of Cecil County to acquire,
design, construct, and equip a Behavioral Health Crisis
Assessment and Stabilization Center, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this
Act, the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior
to the effective date of this Act[. Notwithstanding Section 1(5)
of this Act, the grantee has until June 1, 2030, to present
evidence that a matching fund will be provided.
Notwithstanding Section 1(7) of this Act, this grant may not
terminate before June 1, 2030] (Cecil County) ........................ [786,000]
0
Chapter 22 of the Acts of 2017, as amended by Chapter 537 of the Acts
of 2020, Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, Chapter 102 of the Acts of
2023, and Chapter 603 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2017 in the total principal amount of [$1,084,416,895]
$1,083,630,895. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018
Section 1(3)
DA07.01 DEPARTMENT OF AGING
(Statewide)
(A) Senior Centers Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire property and to design, construct, renovate, and equip
senior citizen activities centers. The funds appropriated for
this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
10–501 through 10–510 of the Human Services Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 .......................................................................................... 1,600,000

HOUSE BILL 391
RA11 MARYLAND STATE LIBRARY AGENCY
(B) State Library Resource Center. Provide funds to complete
construction of renovations and equip the Central Branch of
Baltimore City’s Enoch Pratt Free Library System (Baltimore
City) ........................................................................................... [4,831,000]
4,244,643
RD00 ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Academic Building and Auditorium. Provide funds to continue
design of and begin to construct and equip the relocation of
the existing athletic field, and to continue design of a new
academic building and auditorium ........................................... [3,600,000]
3,441,434
Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2018, as amended by Chapter 344 of the Acts
of 2022, Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, and Chapter 720 of the Acts of
2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2018 in the total principal amount of [$1,088,668,022]
$1,087,923,099. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019
Section 1(3)
DA07.01 DEPARTMENT OF AGING
(Statewide)
(A) Senior Centers Capital Grant Program. Provide grants to
acquire property and to design, construct, renovate, and equip
senior citizen activities centers. The funds appropriated for
this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
10–501 through 10–510 of the Human Services Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,

HOUSE BILL 391 41
2028 .......................................................................................... 818,000
DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING
DW01.11 DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL PROGRAMS
(Statewide)
(A) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds for the African
American Heritage Preservation Grant Program to assist in the
protection of properties with cultural and historic significance
to the African American community. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §
5A–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF THIS ACT, THIS
AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE BEFORE JUNE 1,
2028 ............................................................................................ 1,000,000
(B) Maryland Historical Trust. Provide funds to be credited to the
Maryland Historical Trust Capital Grant Fund for historical
preservation and museum assistance. The funds appropriated
for this purpose shall be administered in accordance with §§
5A–328 and 5A–353 through 5A–359 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7) OF
THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 ............................................................... 600,000
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
LA12.05 OFFICE OF MARKETING, ANIMAL INDUSTRIES AND
CONSUMER SERVICES
(A) Salisbury Animal Health Laboratory Replacement. Provide
funds to complete construction and equipping of a replacement
animal health laboratory in Salisbury (Wicomico County) ....... [12,417,000]
11,794,776
RD00 ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND
(St. Mary’s County)
(A) Academic Building and Auditorium. Provide funds to
complete design and continue construction of a new academic
building and auditorium, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project ........................................................................................ [13,208,000]
12,307,876

HOUSE BILL 391
RP00 MARYLAND PUBLIC BROADCASTING COMMISSION
(B) Studio A Renovation and Addition. Provide funds to complete
design, construction, and equipping of the renovation and
expansion of Studio A (Baltimore County) .................................. [8,210,000]
8,085,835
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(AQ) Maryland Independent College and University Association –
Stevenson University. Provide a grant equal to the lesser of (i)
$2,900,000 or (ii) the amount of the matching fund provided, to
the Board of Trustees of Stevenson University for the design,
construction, and equipping of a new academic building on the
Owings Mills Campus at Stevenson University, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose. Notwithstanding Section 1(5) of this Act,
the matching fund may consist of funds expended prior to the
effective date of this Act. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 1(7)
OF THIS ACT, THIS AUTHORIZATION MAY NOT TERMINATE
BEFORE JUNE 1, 2028 (Baltimore County) .............................. 2,900,000
Chapter 14 of the Acts of 2019, as amended by Chapter 537 of the Acts
of 2020, Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024, and Chapter 603 of the Acts of
2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2019 in the total principal amount of [$1,085,520,365]
$1,083,873,852. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020
Section 1(3)
RB23 BOWIE STATE UNIVERSITY
(Prince George’s County)
(B) Pedestrian and Vehicular Infrastructure Improvements.

HOUSE BILL 391 43
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip pedestrian and
vehicular infrastructure improvements in connection with
development of a Maryland Area Regional Commuter line
station (Prince George’s County) ................................................ [150,000]
0
Chapter 537 of the Acts of 2020, as amended by Chapter 344 of the
Acts of 2022, Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024, and Chapter 603 of the
Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2020 in the total principal amount of [$1,080,456,455]
$1,080,306,455. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021
Section 1(3)
RB26 FROSTBURG STATE UNIVERSITY
(Allegany County)
(B) Challenger Center. Provide funds to begin construction of the
Challenger Center, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of
this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this
project ......................................................................................... [3,000,000]
0
DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
VE01 RESIDENTIAL SERVICES
(A) Baltimore City Juvenile Justice Center Education Expansion.
Provide funds to complete design, begin construction, and begin
equipping the expansion of the existing Baltimore City
Juvenile Justice Center’s educational programming and
educational support spaces, provided that notwithstanding
Section 6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this

HOUSE BILL 391
project (Baltimore City) ............................................................... [2,550,000]
402,868
Chapter 63 of the Acts of 2021, as amended by Chapter 344 of the Acts
of 2022, Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024, and Chapter 603 of the Acts of
2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2021 in the total principal amount of [$1,038,046,291]
$1,032,899,159. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022
Section 1(3)
RB31 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND BALTIMORE COUNTY
(Baltimore County)
(A) Sherman Hall Renovation. Provide funds to continue design
AND BEGIN CONSTRUCTION of the renovation of Sherman
Hall ................................................................................................ 1,886,000
Chapter 344 of the Acts of 2022, as amended by Chapter 102 of the
Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(Statewide)
(C) Critical Maintenance Program. Provide funds to construct
capital improvements such as planned maintenance and repair
projects at public use facilities on State–owned and local
government property .................................................................... 4,000,000
Provided that the remainder of this authorization shall be
allocated as follows:

HOUSE BILL 391 45
(7) Patapsco Valley State Park –
Alberton Lot Paving (Howard
County) ............................................ [100,000]
0
(19) Seneca Creek State Park –
Replace Security Fence and
Lights – Maintenance Complex
(Montgomery County) ...................... [29,000]
0
(21) Seneca Creek State Park – Install
Door Openers to Shop and Cold
Storage Overhead Doors
(Montgomery County) ..................... [20,000]
0
(26) Assateague State Park – Replace
Fiberglass Showers and Hot Water
Heaters – Bathhouse 1–5 and
Concession (Worcester County) ...... [125,000]
0
(30) Cedarville State Forest – Re–Roof
and Chimney Repairs Shelters #1
and #2 (Prince George’s County) ..... [60,000]
0
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QB01.01 DIVISION OF CORRECTION – HEADQUARTERS
(Baltimore City)
(A) Women’s Prerelease Center. Provide funds to begin design of a
new prerelease unit for women .................................................... [3,000,000]
0
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(D) New Health and Human Services Building, Phase II. Provide
funds to complete construction and equipping of the new

HOUSE BILL 391
Health and Human Services Building (Baltimore City) ............. [60,604,000]
57,604,000
ZB02 LOCAL JAILS AND DETENTION CENTERS
(A) Frederick County Adult Detention Center Phase IV Medical
Addition. Provide a grant to Frederick County, Maryland, to
complete construction and equipping of a new medical unit at
the Frederick County Adult Detention Center, subject to the
requirement that the grantee provide an equal and matching
fund for this purpose (Frederick County) ................................... [1,011,000]
0
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, as amended by Chapter 720 of the
Acts of 2024 and Chapter 603 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2023 in the total principal amount of [$1,180,603,609]
$1,170,592,609. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Chapter 102 of the Acts of 2023, as amended by Chapter 603 of the
Acts of 2025
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
STATE GOVERNMENT CENTER – ANNAPOLIS
(Anne Arundel County)
(C) State House and Old Treasury Building Restoration. Provide
funds to complete construction of the restoration of and
improvements to the exterior and grounds of the historic
Maryland State House and interior of the State House and
Old Treasury buildings, including the old Senate chamber, in
the Annapolis State Government Complex .............................. [18,339,000]
15,339,000
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024

HOUSE BILL 391 47
Section 1(3)
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QB01.01 DIVISION OF CORRECTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) New Life Skills and Re–Entry Center for Women. Provide
funds to complete design of a prerelease facility for women in
the City of Baltimore .................................................................... [4,025,000]
0
RB25 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND EASTERN SHORE
(Somerset County)
(A) [Campus Flood Mitigation] CAMPUS SWITCHGEAR
REPLACEMENT. [Provide funds to complete design and
construction of site and building improvements to reduce
damage during flood events] PROVIDE FUNDS TO REPLACE
THE CAMPUS SWITCHGEAR ....................................................... 3,129,000
VE01 DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
(Baltimore City)
(A) Maryland Youth Residence Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to begin design of the renovation and expansion
of a residential treatment center for male youths in Baltimore
City ................................................................................................ [1,430,000]
0
Chapter 720 of the Acts of 2024, as amended by Chapter 603 of the
Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2024 in the total principal amount of [$1,805,846,500]
$1,800,391,500. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.

HOUSE BILL 391
Chapter 603 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan of 2025 in the total principal amount of [$1,814,825,000]
$1,765,318,000. This loan shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
Section 1(3)
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(C) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project[.
Further provided that $17,030,000 of this authorization shall
be used for the design, construction, and equipping of the New
State Veterans Home in Sykesville and serve as the matching
fund requirements should Maryland receive a conditional
federal award from the Veterans Home Construction Grant
Program prior to June 1, 2026] (Anne Arundel County) ........ 26,117,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QB01.01 DIVISION OF CORRECTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) New Life Skills and Re–Entry Center for Women. Provide
funds to complete design and begin construction of a prerelease
facility for women ......................................................................... [2,000,000]
0
QT04 DIVISION OF PRETRIAL DETENTION
(Baltimore City)
(A) Baltimore Therapeutic Treatment Center. Provide funds to

HOUSE BILL 391 49
complete design and begin construction of a therapeutic
treatment and detention center at the Baltimore City
Correctional Complex, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may commence on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project[.
Further provided that $45,857,000 of this authorization shall
be used for the design, construction, and equipping of the New
State Veterans Home in Sykesville and serve as the matching
fund requirements should Maryland receive a conditional
federal award from the Veterans Home Construction Program
prior to June 1, 2026] ........... ....................................................... [45,857,000]
0
RB25 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND EASTERN SHORE
(Somerset County)
(A) [New Residence Hall] NUTTLE HALL DEMOLITION. Provide
funds for [preliminary design to assist with predevelopment
activities for a new residence hall] THE PLANNING, DESIGN,
AND CONSTRUCTION OF THE DEMOLITION OF NUTTLE
HALL INCLUDING ALL RELATED SITE AND UTILITY
WORK ........................................................................................... 1,000,000
VE01 DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES
(Baltimore City)
(A) Maryland Youth Residence Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to continue design of the renovation and
expansion of a residential treatment center for male youths in
Baltimore City ............................................................................. [1,150,000]
0
ZA00 MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAMS
(FT) Mid Shore Regional Detention Center. Provide a grant to the
Board of County Commissioners of Queen Anne’s County for
the acquisition, planning, design, construction, expansion,
repair, renovation, reconstruction, site improvement, and
capital equipping of the Mid Shore Regional Detention Center
(Queen Anne’s County) ................................................................ [500,000]
0
Section 1(11)
Notwithstanding §§ 8–125(e) and 8–132 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, the State Treasurer shall determine the amount of premium from the sale of bonds

HOUSE BILL 391
in fiscal years 2024 [and], 2025, AND 2026 to be transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund.
Upon each issuance of State bonds in fiscal years 2024 [and], 2025, AND 2026, the
Treasurer shall notify the Comptroller of the Treasurer’s determination and the
Comptroller shall credit the premium accordingly. Premium from the sale of bonds in fiscal
years 2024 [and], 2025, AND 2026 that is not transferred to the Annuity Bond Fund may,
upon approval of the Board of Public Works, be expended by the Comptroller for any of the
public purposes set forth in Section 1(3) of this Act, including any applicable architects’ and
engineers’ fees.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
declares that it is the public policy of this State to manage State general obligation bond
debt in a manner that will maintain Maryland’s high quality credit rating. The General
Assembly further declares that legislative oversight, control, and review of all forms of
State obligations are essential to maintenance of the State’s existing bond rating and
protection of the fiscal integrity of the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, before work may commence
pursuant to any supplement to any appropriation contained in this Act, satisfactory
evidence must be given to the Board of Public Works that the project can be completed with
the aggregate of the funds in this Act and previously appropriated for the stated purpose.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) with the approval of the Department of Budget and Management, any
appropriation for design provided in this Act may be used to fund construction if the amount
of the appropriation exceeds the amount required for design expenses, including allowances
for contingencies; and
(2) with the approval of the Department of Budget and Management, any
appropriation for construction provided in this Act may be used to purchase capital
equipment if the amount of the appropriation exceeds the amount required for construction
expenses, including allowances for contingencies.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as otherwise provided
in this Act, before a State agency or institution named in this Act as responsible for an
individual item may begin work with funds appropriated by this Act, the agency or
institution shall provide satisfactory evidence to the Board of Public Works that the work
described in the individual item can be completed with the funds specified for that item.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, with the approval of the
Department of Budget and Management, any appropriation under the provisions of this
Act that is in excess of the amount needed for a project may be credited to the Construction
Contingency Fund under § 3–609 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
Notwithstanding the fund balance restriction set forth in § 3–609(c) of the State Finance
and Procurement Article, any funds credited to the Fund may cause the total balance in
the Fund to exceed 1.25% of the capital debt affordability limit as determined under Title
8 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, in fiscal year 2027.

HOUSE BILL 391 51
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if federal funds are available
to help accomplish any project identified in this Act, the State agency or institution
responsible for the project shall make efforts through proper administrative procedures to
obtain these federal funds. Before spending any funds appropriated by this Act, the agency
or institution shall certify its efforts to the Board of Public Works and state the reason for
any failure to obtain federal funds. If federal funds are obtained, they shall be used to defray
the costs of the project described in this Act and not to expand its scope.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) for any appropriation for the planning of a State–owned project provided in
this Act, if a program required by § 3–602(d) of the State Finance and Procurement Article
has not been submitted, the State agency or institution responsible for the project shall
submit a program to the Department of Budget and Management for approval before funds
may be expended from the appropriation; and
(2) for any appropriation for the construction of a State–owned project provided
in this Act, if preliminary plans and outline specifications required by § 3–602(f)(2)(i) of the
State Finance and Procurement Article have not been prepared, the State agency or
institution responsible for the project shall submit preliminary plans and outline
specifications to the Department of Budget and Management for approval before funds may
be expended from the appropriation.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That no portion of the proceeds of
a loan or any of the matching funds provided for a project funded under this Act may be
used for the furtherance of an essentially religious endeavor. Upon the request of the Board
of Public Works, a recipient of the proceeds of a loan under this Act shall submit evidence
satisfactory to the Board that none of the proceeds of the loan or any matching funds have
been or are being used for a purpose prohibited by this Act.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Comptroller may
advance funds to any loan funds account established pursuant to a general obligation bond
loan enabling Act for any expenditure authorized by that Act, provided that if general
obligation bonds have not been issued under the authority of that Act, the next ensuing
sale of general obligation bonds shall include the issuance of bonds under the authority of
that Act in an amount at least equivalent to the amount of the funds so advanced.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 13, 14, 15, and 16
of Chapter 603 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025 be repealed.
SECTION 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2027 in the total principal amount
of $409,176,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State

HOUSE BILL 391
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(A) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
continue construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project
(Anne Arundel County) ................................................................ 52,692,000
(B) Washington County District Court Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to complete construction of a renovation and an
addition to the Washington County District Court in
Hagerstown (Washington County) ............................................... 739,000
MILITARY DEPARTMENT
DH01.04 MILITARY DEPARTMENT OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE
(Frederick County)
(A) Frederick Readiness Center Renovation and Expansion.
Provide funds to complete construction of the renovation and
expansion of the Frederick Readiness Center ............................ 2,678,000
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
KA05 CAPITAL GRANTS AND LOANS ADMINISTRATION
(A) Natural Resources Development Fund. Provide funds to
construct capital development projects on Department of
Natural Resources property in accordance with § 5–903(g) of

HOUSE BILL 391 53
the Natural Resources Article .................................................... 1,424,000
(1) Rocky Gap State Park –
Campground Improvements
(Allegany County) ............................ 1,424,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to continue construction of renovations to the North Wing
of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to the
hospital, provided that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act,
work may continue on this project prior to the appropriation of
all funds necessary to complete this project ............................... 28,593,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
continue construction of the replacement perimeter fencing and
security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ............................................................... 12,801,000
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND
RB21 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE CAMPUS
(Baltimore City)
(A) Central Electric Substation and Electrical Infrastructure
Upgrades. Provide funds to complete construction of an electric
substation and electrical infrastructure upgrades ..................... 12,376,000
RB22 UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS
(Prince George’s County)
(A) New Health and Human Sciences Complex. Provide funds to
complete construction of the Health and Human Sciences
Complex for the School of Public Health and Academy for
Innovation and Entrepreneurship .............................................. 47,920,000

HOUSE BILL 391
RB36 UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND OFFICE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Rita Colwell Center Deferred Maintenance. Provide funds to
complete construction of deferred maintenance improvements,
including roof replacement and central plant upgrades, at the
Rita Colwell Center in Baltimore City ....................................... 4,820,000
RC00 BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Learning Commons Renovation and Addition. Provide funds to
continue construction of the renovation and expansion of the
Bard Library to create a Learning Commons building, provided
that notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue
on this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary
to complete this project ................................................................ 23,903,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence, high school
girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite health center,
student center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project ... 22,937,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 65,092,000
(1) Allegany College of Maryland –
Workforce Development and
Training Center Renovation
(Allegany County) ........................... 6,724,000

HOUSE BILL 391 55
(2) Anne Arundel Community College
– Dragun Building Renovation
(Anne Arundel County) ................... 7,384,000
(3) Chesapeake College – New Queen
Anne’s Technical Building (Queen
Anne’s County) ................................. 16,447,000
(4) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Automotive
Technology Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County) ....... 5,635,000
(5) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) .... 6,038,000
(6) Prince George’s Community College
– New Charlene Mickens Dukes
Student Center (Prince George’s
County) ............................................. 22,864,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue construction of a new electrical substation,
substation upgrades, and related electrical infrastructure
components at Morgan State University, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 37,250,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to continue
construction of the New Science Center, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 74,944,000
UB00 MARYLAND ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE
(A) State Water and Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Fund.
Provide funds to design, construct, and equip capital
improvements for State institutions. Expenditures for the
following projects may not exceed the amounts listed below by

HOUSE BILL 391
more than 7.5% without notification to the General Assembly.
Funds may be spent only on the project listed below or on prior
or future authorized projects. Expenditure of any part of this
appropriation for a prior or future authorized project shall also
require notification to the General Assembly ............................. 11,712,000
(1) Albert Powell Fish Hatchery –
Wastewater Treatment Plant
(Washington County) ....................... 1,278,000
(2) Charlotte Hall Veterans Home –
Water Treatment Plant Upgrade
(St. Mary’s County) .......................... 5,766,000
(3) Maryland Correctional Institution
Boiler Plant – Physical Plant and
Major Systems Upgrade
(Washington County) ....................... 1,728,000
(4) Swallow Falls State Park – Water
and Wastewater Treatment Plant
Upgrade (Garrett County) ............... 2,940,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Barrack L – Forestville: New Barrack and Garage. Provide
funds to continue construction of a replacement barrack and
garage in Forestville, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project .... 9,295,000
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
of the bonds.
SECTION 14. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2028 in the total principal amount
of $215,424,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.

HOUSE BILL 391 57
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
DE02.01 BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
JUDICIARY/MULTISERVICE CENTERS
(Anne Arundel County)
(A) New Supreme Court of Maryland Building. Provide funds to
complete construction of a new Supreme Court of Maryland
Building in Annapolis .................................................................. 26,346,000
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
ML10 CLIFTON T. PERKINS HOSPITAL CENTER
(Howard County)
(A) Renovation of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital North Wing. Provide
funds to complete construction of renovations to the North
Wing of Clifton T. Perkins Hospital Center and an addition to
the hospital ................................................................................. 4,766,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES
QR02.03 ROXBURY CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION
(Washington County)
(A) RCI Perimeter Fence System Replacement. Provide funds to
complete construction of the replacement perimeter fencing
and security systems at Roxbury Correctional Institution ........ 2,133,000
RC00 BALTIMORE CITY COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(Baltimore City)
(A) Learning Commons Renovation and Addition. Provide funds to
complete construction of the renovation and expansion of the
Bard Library to create a Learning Commons building .............. 3,984,000
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

HOUSE BILL 391
(Frederick County)
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to continue
construction of a new high school boys’ residence, high school
girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite health center,
student center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick, provided that notwithstanding Section 6
of this Act, work may continue on this project prior to the
appropriation of all funds necessary to complete this project ... 40,206,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article, provided that notwithstanding Section
6 of this Act, work may continue on each of these projects prior
to the appropriation of all funds necessary to complete the
project .......................................................................................... 68,515,000
(1) Chesapeake College – New Queen
Anne’s Technical Building (Queen
Anne’s County) ................................. 8,223,000
(2) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Student
Services Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County) ....... 1,926,000
(3) Community College of Baltimore
County – Essex – Primary
Switchgear and Distribution
Replacement (Baltimore County) .... 2,571,000
(4) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County) ......... 32,408,000
(5) Prince George’s Community College
– New Charlene Mickens Dukes
Student Center (Prince George’s
County) ............................................. 23,387,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY

HOUSE BILL 391 59
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to continue construction of a new electrical substation,
substation upgrades, and related electrical infrastructure
components at Morgan State University, provided that
notwithstanding Section 6 of this Act, work may continue on
this project prior to the appropriation of all funds necessary to
complete this project .................................................................... 13,039,000
(B) New Science Center, Phase II. Provide funds to complete
construction of the New Science Center ...................................... 55,551,000
WA01 DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE
(Prince George’s County)
(A) Barrack L – Forestville: New Barrack and Garage. Provide
funds to complete construction of a replacement barrack and
garage in Forestville ..................................................................... 884,000
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
of the bonds.
SECTION 15. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) The Board of Public Works may borrow money and incur indebtedness on
behalf of the State of Maryland through a State loan to be known as the Maryland
Consolidated Capital Bond Loan Preauthorization Act of 2029 in the total principal amount
of $36,349,000. These loans shall be evidenced by the issuance, sale, and delivery of State
general obligation bonds authorized by a resolution of the Board of Public Works and
issued, sold, and delivered in accordance with §§ 8–117 through 8–124 and 8–131.2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The bonds to evidence these loans or installments of these loans may be sold
as a single issue or may be consolidated and sold as part of a single issue of bonds under §
8–122 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) The cash proceeds of the sale of the bonds shall be paid to the Treasurer and
first shall be applied to the payment of the expenses of issuing, selling, and delivering the
bonds, unless funds for this purpose are otherwise provided, and then shall be credited on
the books of the Comptroller and expended, on approval by the Board of Public Works, for
the following public purposes, including any applicable architects’ and engineers’ fees:
RE01 MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(Frederick County)

HOUSE BILL 391
(A) New Student Residences. Provide funds to complete
construction of a new high school boys’ residence, high school
girls’ residence, flexible residence, satellite health center,
student center, and central offices at the Maryland School for
the Deaf in Frederick .................................................................. 8,650,000
RI00 MARYLAND HIGHER EDUCATION COMMISSION
(A) Community College Construction Grant Program. Provide
funds to assist the subdivisions in the acquisition of property
and in the design, construction, renovation, and equipping of
local and regional community college buildings, site
improvements, and facilities. The funds appropriated for this
purpose shall be administered in accordance with § 11–105(j)
of the Education Article ............................................................... 25,781,000
(1) Community College of Baltimore
County – Catonsville – Student
Services Center Renovation and
Expansion (Baltimore County) ........ 8,271,000
(2) Montgomery College – New
Germantown Student Services
Center (Montgomery County) .......... 17,510,000
RM00 MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY
(Baltimore City)
(A) Campuswide Electric Infrastructure Upgrades. Provide funds
to complete construction of a new electrical substation,
substation upgrades, and related electrical infrastructure
components at Morgan State University .................................... 1,918,000
(4) An annual tax is imposed on all assessable property in the State in rate and
amount sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, as and when due and
until paid in full. The principal shall be discharged within 15 years after the date of issue
of the bonds.
SECTION 16. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the net new debt to be
authorized by this Act may not exceed $1,750,000,000 as evidenced by the following:
Debt to be authorized by this Act ...................................... 1,824,782,000
Subtotal .............................................................................. 1,824,782,000
Reductions in previously authorized State Debt made in this

HOUSE BILL 391 61
bill ........................................................................................ 74,782,000
New debt to be authorized by this Act ............................... 1,750,000,000
Bond premium proceeds authorized by this Act .......................5,000,000
Total authorizations and bond premium proceeds authorized
by this Act ........................................................................ 1,829,782,000
SECTION 17. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Board of Public Works
may approve contracts and otherwise obligate funds authorized in this Act upon the
effective date of the relevant section of this Act.
SECTION 18. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 13 of this Act shall
take effect June 1, 2027.
SECTION 19. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 14 of this Act shall
take effect June 1, 2028.
SECTION 20. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 15 of this Act shall
take effect June 1, 2029.
SECTION 21. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Sections 18, 19, and 20 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.